Indiana, session 2026, HB1189.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-2.5-15-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2025,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. The following apply if the corporation
approves an application for a specific transaction award certificate:
(1) The corporation shall require the qualified data center user or
quantum computing research, advanced computing, and defense
infrastructure network operator, as applicable, to enter into an
agreement with the corporation as a condition of receiving a
specific transaction award certificate under this chapter.
(2) The agreement with the corporation must include:
(A) a detailed description of the project that is the subject of
the agreement that includes documentation of compliance with
the requirement that the investment be specific to
infrastructure for the Indiana defense industry or quantum
computing research or advanced computing;
(B) a requirement that the qualified data center user or
quantum computing research, advanced computing, and
2026 IN 1189—LS 6689/DI 125


defense infrastructure network operator, as applicable,
limit bids or requests for proposals for the project to labor
unions or employers that have project labor agreements;
(B) (C) the duration of the specific transaction award
certificate and the first taxable year for which the award
provided by this chapter may be used; and
(C) (D) a requirement that the qualified data center user or
quantum computing research, advanced computing, and
defense infrastructure network operator, as applicable,
annually report to the corporation on the amount of taxes that
were not paid by the qualified data center user or quantum
computing research, advanced computing, and defense
infrastructure network operator in connection with the
purchase of data center equipment or quantum computing
research, advanced computing, and defense infrastructure
network equipment, as applicable.
2026 IN 1189—LS 6689/DI 125